Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202214-3,126
Streets; improvement or construction; materials to be used; designate by petition.

The property owners within an improvement district may designate the material to be used in the improvement or construction of streets or alleys or other grounds within such district by petition, signed by a majority of such property owners, filed with the city within thirty days after notice of the proposed improvement.

Laws 1959, c. 36, § 43, p. 210;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 130.
July 21, 2022